North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-51.1 Oil Extraction Tax
57-51.1-07.7.
Municipal infrastructure fund — Continuing appropriation — State treasurer — Reports.

There is created in the state treasury the municipal infrastructure fund. The fund consists of all moneys deposited in the fund under section 57-51.1-07.5. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the state treasurer on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing grants to cities located in non-oil-producing counties. The grant funding may be distributed only to cities located in non-oil-producing counties, excluding hub cities, and may be used only for essential infrastructure projects.

By November thirtieth of each even-numbered year, starting in 2022, a city that receives a grant from the fund shall provide a report to the state treasurer on the use of the funding. The state treasurer shall notify cities of the reporting requirement by November first of each even-numbered year, starting in 2022. Upon request, the state treasurer may provide an extension of up to fifteen days for a city to submit the report. The state treasurer shall determine the format of the report. The report must include the amount of grant funding received and spent by the city and a description of the infrastructure projects completed in part or in whole with the grant funding. The state treasurer shall make the reports available to the public on the state treasurer’s website. A city that does not provide the report in a timely manner or in the correct format is not eligible to receive a grant from the fund for a period of two years starting from the date the report was due. If a city uses the funding in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section as identified in any financial audits conducted by the state auditor or an independent accounting firm, the state treasurer shall reduce any future grants to that city by the amount spent that was inconsistent with the requirements.

Within forty days after the fund balance is greater than or equal to the amount needed for the grants under this subsection or by September thirtieth of each odd-numbered year, whichever is earlier, the state treasurer shall distribute moneys in the fund as grants to cities for essential infrastructure projects. The state treasurer shall distribute the grants only if the fund balance is at least ten percent of the amount needed for distributions under this subsection based on the following:

Two million five hundred thousand dollars to each city with a population of at least five thousand;

Five hundred thousand dollars to each city with a population of at least two thousand but less than five thousand; and

One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to each city with a population of at least one thousand but less than two thousand.

If, at the time of the distributions, the moneys in the fund are less than the amount needed for the grants under this subsection, the state treasurer shall distribute the grants under this subsection on a pro rata basis.

For the purposes of determining the city’s population under this subsection, the state treasurer shall use the most recent actual or estimated census data published by the United States census bureau.

Within sixty days after the fund receives its statutory limit of oil and gas tax allocations under section 57-51.1-07.5 or by September thirtieth of each odd-numbered year, whichever is earlier, the state treasurer shall distribute the moneys in the fund as grants to cities for essential infrastructure projects. The state treasurer shall distribute the grants only if the fund balance is at least ten percent of the amount needed for distributions under this subsection based on the following: based on the following:

One hundred fifty dollars per person of the city’s population.

In addition to the amounts in subdivision a, for a city with a positive average of the annual percentage increase in population from three years prior, a dollar amount equal to the product of the following:

The amount calculated in subdivision a; and

The average of the annual percentage increase in population from three years prior, multiplied by ten.

In addition to the amounts in subdivisions a and b, for a city with a positive average of the annual percentage increase in taxable property values from three years prior, a dollar amount equal to the average of the annual property valuation percentage increase for the three most recent years, multiplied by twenty-five thousandths.

Grants may be distributed under this subdivision only if the grant distributions under subsection 2 are completed. If the moneys in the fund are insufficient to provide for the grants, the state treasurer shall distribute the grants under this subsection on a pro rata basis. If any moneys remain in the fund after the distribution of grants under this subsection, the state treasurer shall distribute any remaining moneys in the fund in proportion to the combined total distributed to each city under this section relative to the combined total distributed to all the cities under this section.

For the purposes of determining the city’s population under this subsection, the state treasurer shall use the most recent actual or estimated census data published by the United States census bureau.

For the purposes of determining taxable property values, the state treasurer shall use the most recent data published by the tax commissioner in the tax levy report.

For purposes of this section:

“Essential infrastructure projects” means capital construction projects to construct new infrastructure or to replace existing infrastructure, which provide the fixed installations necessary for the function of a city. Capital construction projects exclude debt repayments and routine maintenance and repair projects, but include the following:

Water treatment plants;

Wastewater treatment plants;

Sewer lines and water lines, including lift stations and pumping systems;

Water storage systems, including dams, water tanks, and water towers;

Storm water infrastructure, including curb and gutter construction;

Road and bridge infrastructure, including paved and unpaved roads and bridges;

Airport infrastructure;

Electricity transmission infrastructure;

Natural gas transmission infrastructure; and

Communications infrastructure, excluding fiber optic infrastructure.

“Fiscal year” means the period beginning September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.

“Non-oil-producing county” means a county that received no allocation of funding or a total allocation of less than five million dollars under subsection 2 of section 57-51-15 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of each biennium.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 504, § 6, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2021, ch. 15, §§ 36, 37, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 57-51.1-07.7 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 37 of Chapter 15, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1015; and Section 36 of Chapter 15, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1015.

57-51.1-07.8.
County and township infrastructure fund — Continuing appropriation — State treasurer — Reports.

There is created in the state treasury the county and township infrastructure fund. The fund consists of all moneys deposited in the fund under section 57-51.1-07.5. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the state treasurer on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing grants to non-oil-producing counties and townships located in non-oil-producing counties. The grant funding may be distributed only to non-oil-producing counties and townships located in non-oil-producing counties and may be used only for road and bridge infrastructure projects.

By November thirtieth of each even-numbered year, starting in 2022, a county that receives a grant from the fund shall provide a report to the state treasurer on the use of the funding. The state treasurer shall notify counties of the reporting requirement by November first of each even-numbered year, starting in 2022. Upon request, the state treasurer may provide an extension of up to fifteen days for a county to submit the report. The state treasurer shall determine the format of the report. The report must include the amount of grant funding received and spent by the county and a description of the road and bridge infrastructure projects completed in part or in whole with the grant funding. The state treasurer shall make the reports available to the public on the state treasurer’s website. A county that does not provide the report in a timely manner or in the correct format is not eligible to receive a grant from the fund for a period of two years starting from the date the report was due. If a county uses the funding in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section as identified in any financial audits conducted by the state auditor or an independent accounting firm, the state treasurer shall reduce any future grants to that county by the amount spent that was inconsistent with the requirements.

Within sixty days after the fund receives its statutory limit of oil and gas tax allocations under section 57-51.1-07.5 or by September thirtieth of each odd-numbered year, whichever is earlier, the state treasurer shall distribute moneys in the fund as grants to counties for road and bridge infrastructure projects. The state treasurer shall distribute the grants only if the fund balance is at least ten percent of the amount needed for distributions under this section.

The state treasurer shall distribute the lesser of thirteen percent of the balance of the fund or sixteen million one hundred thousand dollars to non-oil-producing counties for the benefit of the organized and unorganized townships within each non-oil-producing county. The distribution to each non-oil-producing county must provide for an equal allocation to each organized and unorganized township. The amount allocated to organized townships under this section must be paid by the county treasurer to each organized township. The amount allocated to unorganized townships under this section must be credited by the county treasurer to a special fund for unorganized township roads. A township is not eligible for an allocation of funds under this section if the township does not maintain any township roads.

After the distributions in subsection 3, the state treasurer shall distribute the remaining money in the fund to non-oil-producing counties based on the most recent data compiled by the upper great plains transportation institute regarding North Dakota’s county, township, and tribal road and bridge infrastructure needs. The distribution to each non-oil-producing county must be proportional to each non-oil-producing county’s total estimated road and bridge investment needs relative to the combined total estimated road and bridge investment needs of all the non-oil-producing counties. The total estimated road and bridge investment needs for each county is the twenty-year estimate for unpaved and paved road and bridge needs as identified by the upper great plains transportation institute. If the data compiled by the upper great plains transportation institute includes more than one twenty-year estimate for the total needs of each county, the state treasurer shall use an average of the twenty-year estimates for each county.

If the moneys in the fund are insufficient to provide for the grants under this section, the state treasurer shall distribute the grants on a pro rata basis.

For purposes of this section:

“Fiscal year” means the period beginning September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.

“Non-oil-producing county” means a county that received no allocation of funding or a total allocation of less than five million dollars under subsection 2 of section 57-51-15 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of each biennium.

“Road and bridge infrastructure projects” means the projects associated with the construction of new unpaved and paved road and bridge infrastructure or associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of existing unpaved and paved road and bridge infrastructure.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 504, § 7, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2021, ch. 15, § 38, effective July 1, 2021.

57-51.1-07.9
State energy research center fund — Continuing appropriation. [Expired effective July 1, 2027]

The state energy research center fund is a special fund in the state treasury. Before depositing oil and gas gross production tax and oil extraction tax revenues under section 57-51.1-07.5, one percent of the revenues must be deposited monthly into the state energy research center fund, up to five million dollars per biennium. All moneys deposited in the state energy research center fund and interest on all such moneys are appropriated on a continuing basis to the industrial commission for distribution to the state energy research center. The state energy research center shall use the funds in accordance with section 15-11-40.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 42, § 27, effective July 1, 2021.

57-51.1-07.9.
State energy research center fund — Continuing appropriation. [Expired effective July 1, 2027]

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 42, § 27, effective July 1, 2021; expired pursuant to 2019, ch. 139, § 3, effective July 1, 2027.

57-51.1-10.
Straddle well distribution.

By Augus t 1, 2021, and on or before April thirtieth of each subsequent fiscal year, the industrial commission shall certify to the tax commissioner the on-reservation trust lands acreage ratio and the on-reservation nontrust lands acreage ratio for each reservation with on-reservation spacing unit acreage. For each reservation, the on-reservation trust lands acreage ratio is calculated by dividing the on-reservation spacing unit acreage consisting of trust lands by the total spacing unit acreage. For each reservation, the on-reservation nontrust lands acreage ratio is calculated by dividing the on-reservation spacing unit acreage consisting of nontrust lands by the total spacing unit acreage. The on-reservation acreage ratios for each reservation are effective for taxable production each fiscal year beginning July first. By August 1, 2021, and on or before June first of each subsequent fiscal year, the tax commissioner shall publish the on-reservation acreage ratios for each reservation.

By August 1, 2021, and on or before April thirtieth of each subsequent fiscal year, the industrial commission shall certify to the tax commissioner the on-reservation trust lands acreage ratio and the on-reservation nontrust lands acreage ratio for each reservation with on-reservation spacing unit acreage. For each reservation, the on-reservation trust lands acreage ratio is calculated by dividing the on-reservation spacing unit acreage consisting of trust lands by the total spacing unit acreage. For each reservation, the on-reservation nontrust lands acreage ratio is calculated by dividing the on-reservation spacing unit acreage consisting of nontrust lands by the total spacing unit acreage. The on-reservation acreage ratios for each reservation are effective for taxable production each fiscal year beginning July first. By August 1, 2021, and on or before June first of each subsequent fiscal year, the tax commissioner shall publish the on-reservation acreage ratios for each reservation.

Fifty percent of the taxes certified under this section for wells drilled before July 1, 2019, multiplied by the on-reservation trust lands acreage ratio calculated under subsection 1 for that reservation;

Fifty percent of the taxes certified under this section for wells drilled before July 1, 2019, multiplied by the on-reservation nontrust lands acreage ratio calculated under subsection 1 for that reservation;

Eighty percent of the taxes certified under this section for wells drilled on or after July 1 , 2019, multiplied by the on-reservation trust lands acreage ratio calculated under subsection 1 for that reservation; and

Twenty percent of the taxes certified under this section for wells drilled on or after July 1 , 2019, multiplied by the on-reservation nontrust lands acreage ratio calculated under subsection 1 for that reservation.

For purposes of this section:

“On-reservation spacing unit acreage” means the mineral acreage located within the exterior boundaries of a reservation in this state from all spacing units with one or more straddle wells.

“Straddle well” means an oil and gas well located outside the exterior boundaries of a reservation which has one or more laterals penetrating a reservation boundary.

“Total spacing unit acreage” means the total mineral acreage from all spacing units with one or more straddle wells.

Upon accepting a payment under this section, if a tribe assesses any tax or fee or imposes any regulation on any current or future straddle well, or assesses an additional tax on any well subject to an agreement under chapter 57-51.2, the agreement under chapter 57-51.2 is void and the state treasurer may not distribute any funds to the tribe under this section or chapter 57-51.2.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 42, § 27, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 483, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

SECTION 2. APPLICATION. This Act applies to oil and gas tax revenue collections allocated by the state treasurer after September 1, 2021.